dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.fat.dix
  <!-- polza; pol; 2 -->
    <pardef n="pol/za__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>za</l>
          <r>za<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oz</l>
          <r>za<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- skrun; skr; 2 -->
    <pardef n="skr/un__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejjen</l>
          <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħabba; ħ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ħ/abba__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abba</l>
          <r>abba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bub</l>
          <r>abba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qawl; q; 2 -->
    <pardef n="q/awl__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>awl</l>
          <r>awl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wiel</l>
          <r>awl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sarvetta; s; 2 -->
    <pardef n="s/arvetta__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arvetta</l>
          <r>arvetta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rievet</l>
          <r>arvetta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qaws; q; 2 -->
    <pardef n="q/aws__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aws</l>
          <r>aws<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wies</l>
          <r>aws<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tieqa; t; 2 -->
    <pardef n="t/ieqa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieqa</l>
          <r>ieqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wieqi</l>
          <r>ieqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħobla; ħ; 4 -->
    <pardef n="ħ/obla__adj_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>obla</l>
          <r>obla<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>biel</l>
          <r>obla<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>biela</l>
          <r>obla<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bieli</l>
          <r>obla<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qorti; q; 2 -->
    <pardef n="q/orti__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orti</l>
          <r>orti<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rati</l>
          <r>orti<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sellum; s; 2 -->
    <pardef n="s/ellum__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ellum</l>
          <r>ellum<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lielem</l>
          <r>ellum<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- serp; s; 2 -->
    <pardef n="s/erp__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erp</l>
          <r>erp<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riep</l>
          <r>erp<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- gardell; g; 2 -->
    <pardef n="g/ardell__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ardell</l>
          <r>ardell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riedel</l>
          <r>ardell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħotba; ħot; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ħot/ba__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ba</l>
          <r>ba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ob</l>
          <r>ba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- werc; wer; 2 -->
    <pardef n="wer/c__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ec</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- folla; fol; 2 -->
    <pardef n="fol/la__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ol</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- russett; r; 2 -->
    <pardef n="r/ussett__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ussett</l>
          <r>ussett<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sieset</l>
          <r>ussett<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- spalla; spal; 2 -->
    <pardef n="spal/la__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qalil; q; 2 -->
    <pardef n="q/alil__adj_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alil</l>
          <r>alil<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>liel</l>
          <r>alil<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xenxul; xe; 2 -->
    <pardef n="xe/nxul__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nxul</l>
          <r>nxul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>xniel</l>
          <r>nxul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- stalla; stal; 2 -->
    <pardef n="stal/la__adj_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>la<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>la<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- grotta; grot; 2 -->
    <pardef n="grot/ta__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- triq; t; 2 -->
    <pardef n="t/riq__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riq</l>
          <r>riq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oroq</l>
          <r>riq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- zokk; z; 2 -->
    <pardef n="z/okk__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>okk</l>
          <r>okk<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kuk</l>
          <r>okk<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xedaq; x; 2 -->
    <pardef n="x/edaq__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>edaq</l>
          <r>edaq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idqa</l>
          <r>edaq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="polza"><i>pol</i><par n="pol/za__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="skrun"><i>skr</i><par n="skr/un__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħabba"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/abba__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qawl"><i>q</i><par n="q/awl__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sarvetta"><i>s</i><par n="s/arvetta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qaws"><i>q</i><par n="q/aws__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tieqa"><i>t</i><par n="t/ieqa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħobla"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/obla__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qorti"><i>q</i><par n="q/orti__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sellum"><i>s</i><par n="s/ellum__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="serp"><i>s</i><par n="s/erp__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gardell"><i>g</i><par n="g/ardell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħotba"><i>ħot</i><par n="ħot/ba__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="werc"><i>wer</i><par n="wer/c__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="folla"><i>fol</i><par n="fol/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="russett"><i>r</i><par n="r/ussett__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="spalla"><i>spal</i><par n="spal/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qalil"><i>q</i><par n="q/alil__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xenxul"><i>xe</i><par n="xe/nxul__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="stalla"><i>stal</i><par n="stal/la__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="grotta"><i>grot</i><par n="grot/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="triq"><i>t</i><par n="t/riq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="zokk"><i>z</i><par n="z/okk__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xedaq"><i>x</i><par n="x/edaq__n_GD"/></e>
